Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB651.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 11(a) of the act of May 25, 1945 (P.L.1050, No.394), known as the Local Tax Collection Law, is amended to read:Section 11. Installment Payment of Taxes.--(a) Any taxing district shall have power to provide by ordinance or resolution for the collection and payment of its taxes in not more than [four] twelve installments. Where payment of taxes is made on the installment basis, no abatement or discount shall be allowed on said taxes.* * *123456789101112131415161718192021 Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0651PN0660 - 2 - 1